Washington statutes.
RCW 12.12.020

Trial by justice.

Upon issue joined, if a jury trial be not demanded, the justice shall hear the evidence, and decide all questions of law and fact, and render judgment accordingly.

[Code 1881 s 1782; 1873 p 350 s 81; 1854 p 237 s 82; RRS s 1848.]